Utah statutes.
53A-20-104.   Enforcement of chapter by state superintendent -- Employment of personnel -- School districts and charter schools -- Certificate of inspection verification.

(1)  The state superintendent of public instruction shall enforce this chapter.

(2)  The superintendent may employ architects or other qualified personnel, or contract with the State Building Board, the state fire marshal, or a local governmental entity to:

(a)  examine the plans and specifications of any school building or alteration submitted under this chapter;

(b)  verify the inspection of any school building during or following construction; and

(c)  perform other functions necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter.

(3) (a) (i)  If a local school board uses the school district's building inspector under Subsection 10-9a-305(6)(a)(ii) or 17-27a-305(6)(a)(ii) and issues its own certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building, the local school board shall file a certificate of inspection verification with the local governmental entity's building official and the State Office of Education, advising those entities that the school district has complied with the inspection provisions of this chapter.

(ii)  If a charter school uses a school district building inspector under Subsection 10-9a-305(6)(a)(ii) or 17-27a-305(6)(a)(ii) and the school district issues to the charter school a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building, the charter school shall file with the State Office of Education a certificate of inspection verification.

(iii)  If a local school board or charter school uses a local governmental entity's building inspector under Subsection 10-9a-305(6)(a)(i) or 17-27a-305(6)(a)(i) and the local governmental entity issues the local school board or charter school a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building, the local school board or charter school shall file with the State Office of Education a certificate of inspection verification.

(iv) (A)  If a local school board or charter school uses an independent, certified building inspector under Subsection 10-9a-305(6)(a)(iii) or 17-27a-305(6)(a)(iii), the local school board or charter school shall, upon completion of all required inspections of the school building, file with the State Office of Education a certificate of inspection verification and a request for the issuance of a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building.

(B)  Upon the local school board's or charter school's filing of the certificate and request as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(iv)(A), the school district or charter school shall be entitled to temporary occupancy of the school building that is the subject of the request for a period of 90 days, beginning the date the request is filed, if the school district or charter school has complied with all applicable fire and life safety code requirements.

(C)  Within 30 days after the local school board or charter school files a request under Subsection (3)(a)(iv)(A) for a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building, the state superintendent of public instruction shall:

(I) (Aa)  issue to the local school board or charter school a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building; or

(Bb)  deliver to the local school board or charter school a written notice indicating deficiencies in the school district's or charter school's compliance with the inspection provisions of this chapter; and

(II)  mail a copy of the certificate authorizing permanent occupancy or the notice of deficiency to the building official of the local governmental entity in which the school building is located.

(D)  Upon the local school board or charter school remedying the deficiencies indicated in the notice under Subsection (3)(a)(iv)(C)(I)(Bb) and notifying the state superintendent of public instruction that the deficiencies have been remedied, the state superintendent of public instruction shall issue a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building and mail a copy of the certificate to the building official of the local governmental entity in which the school building is located.

(E) (I)  The state superintendent of public instruction may charge the school district or charter school a fee for an inspection that the superintendent considers necessary to enable the superintendent to issue a certificate authorizing permanent occupancy of the school building.

(II)  A fee under Subsection (3)(a)(iv)(E)(I) may not exceed the actual cost of performing the inspection.

(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (3):

(i)  "local governmental entity" means either a municipality, for a school building located within a municipality, or a county, for a school building located within an unincorporated area in the county; and

(ii)  "certificate of inspection verification" means a standard inspection form developed by the state superintendent in consultation with local school boards and charter schools to verify that inspections by qualified inspectors have occurred.



Amended by Chapter 290, 2008 General Session

